Utah statutes.
7-1-208.   Supervisor of credit unions -- Responsibilities.
(1)  The commissioner shall designate an examiner as supervisor of credit
unions who shall be sufficiently qualified by training and experience in the
business of credit unions or as an employee of a state or federal agency
supervising credit unions to perform the duties of the office.
(2)  The supervisor of credit unions is responsible, subject to the direction
and control of the commissioner, for the general supervision and examination
of all credit unions subject to the jurisdiction of the department and other
institutions assigned by the commissioner.  The supervisor shall assist and
advise the commissioner in the execution of the laws of this state relating to
these institutions, and shall perform other duties prescribed in this title or
assigned by the commissioner.
